en: Frozen poultry
de: Gefrorenes Geflügel
fi: Siipikarjapakasteet
fr: Volailles surgelées, Volaille surgelée
hr: Smrznuta perad
lt: Šaldyta paukštiena
nl: Diepvries gevogelten

en: Poultries, poultry
bg: Пилешко и птиче месо
ca: Aus de corral
da: Fjerkræ
de: Geflügel
es: Aves
fi: siipikarja
fr: Volailles, viande de volailles
he: מאכלי עוף
hr: Peradi
hu: Szárnyasok
it: Pollami
ja: 家禽の肉
lt: Paukštiena
nl: Gevogelten
pl: Mięso drobiowe, Drób
pt: Avícolas
ru: Мясо сельскохозяйственных птиц
sv: Fjäderfän
th: สัตว์ปีก
tr: Kümes ürünleri
zh: 家禽

en: Cooked poultries, Cooked poultry
de: Gekochtes Geflügel
es: Aves cocidas
fi: Kypsennetyt siipikarjat
fr: Volailles cuites
hr: Kuhana perad
it: Pollame cotto
lt: Kepta paukštiena
nl: Gekookt gevogelte

en: Ground Poultry meat
fr: Viande de Volaille hachée

en: Frozen ground Poultry meat
fr: Viande de Volaille hachée surgelée

en: Poultries from Ancenis
fr: Volaille d'Ancenis

en: Poultries from Bresse
fr: Volaille de Bresse

en: Poultries from Janzé
fr: Volaille de Janzé, Volailles de Janzé

en: Poultry from Languedoc
fr: Volailles du Languedoc

en: Poultry from Lauragais
fr: Volaille du Lauragais

en: Hen meat and skin
fr: viande de poule avec peau

en: Frozen Hen
fr: Poule surgelée

en: Hen meat
fr: viande de poule

en: Cooked chicken heart
fr: Coeur de poulet cuit

en: Chicken heart, chicken heart
bg: Пилешки сърца
fr: Coeur de poulet
hr: Pileće srce
ja: 鶏ハツ

en: Chicken liver, chicken liver
bg: Пилешки черен дроб
fr: Foie de poulet
hr: Pileća jetra
ja: 鶏レバー
lt: Vištienos kepenėlės

en: Cooked chicken liver
fr: Foie de poulet cuit
hr: Kuhana pileća jetrica
lt: Keptos vištienos kepenėlės

en: Preserved poultry liver
fr: Confit de foie de volaille

en: Poultry liver, poultry liver
de: Geflügelleber
fr: Foie de volaille
hr: Jetra peradi

en: Poultry minced preparations
fr: Haché de volaille